Vermont, session 2025-2026, H302.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 8 V.S.A. § 4099f is added to read:
§ 4099f. FERTILITY-RELATED SERVICES
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
VT LEG #380804 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.302
2025 Page 2 of 7
(1) “Experimental fertility procedure” means a procedure for which the
published medical evidence is not sufficient for the American Society for
Reproductive Medicine, its successor organization, or a comparable
organization to regard the procedure as established medical practice.
(2) “Fertility diagnostic care” means procedures, products, medications,
and services intended to provide information about an individual’s fertility,
including laboratory assessments and imaging studies.
(3) “Fertility preservation services” means procedures, products,
medications, and services intended to preserve fertility, consistent with
established medical practice and professional guidelines published by the
American Society for Reproductive Medicine, its successor organization, or a
comparable organization, for an individual who has a medical or genetic
condition or who is expected to undergo treatment that may directly or
indirectly cause a risk of impairment of fertility. “Fertility preservation
services” includes the procurement and cryopreservation of gametes, embryos,
and reproductive material and storage from the date of cryopreservation until
the individual reaches 30 years of age or for a period of five years, whichever
is longer. Coverage for storage may be offered for a longer period of time.
(4) “Fertility treatment” means procedures, products, medications, and
services intended to achieve a pregnancy that results in a live birth and that are
provided in a manner consistent with established medical practice and
VT LEG #380804 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.302
2025 Page 3 of 7
professional guidelines published by the American Society for Reproductive
Medicine, its successor organization, or a comparable organization.
(5) “Gamete” means a sperm or egg.
(6) “Health care provider” has the same meaning as in 18 V.S.A.
§ 9402.
(7) “Health insurance plan” means any individual or group health
insurance policy; any hospital or medical service corporation or health
maintenance organization subscriber contract; or any other health benefit plan
offered, issued, or renewed for any person in this State by a health insurer.
The term does not include benefit plans providing coverage for specific
diseases or other limited benefit coverage.
(8) “Health insurer” has the same meaning as in 18 V.S.A. § 9402.
(9) “Infertility” means any and all of the following:
(A) the presence of a condition recognized by a health care provider
as a cause of loss or impairment of fertility, based on an individual’s medical,
sexual, and reproductive history; age; physical findings; diagnostic testing; or a
combination of these;
(B) an individual’s inability to achieve a pregnancy after unprotected
sexual intercourse over a period of not more than 12 months for an intended
gestational parent under 35 years of age and a period of not more than six
months for an intended gestational parent who is 35 years of age or older;
VT LEG #380804 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.302
2025 Page 4 of 7
pregnancy resulting in miscarriage or stillbirth does not restart the 12-month or
six-month time period to qualify as having infertility if the individual and the
individual’s partner have the necessary gametes to achieve pregnancy;
(C) an individual’s inability to achieve a pregnancy as an individual
or with a partner because the individual or the individual and the individual’s
partner do not have the necessary gametes to achieve a pregnancy; or
(D) an individual’s increased risk, independently or with the
individual’s partner, of transmitting a serious, inheritable genetic or
chromosomal abnormality to a child.
(b) Required coverage. A health insurance plan shall provide coverage for
the following fertility-related services:
(1) Fertility diagnostic care for all covered individuals.
(2) Fertility treatment for covered individuals with infertility, including
intrauterine insemination treatment with donor or partner semen, at least four
retrievals of oocytes under anesthesia for in vitro fertilization (IVF) with donor
or partner semen or egg, unlimited embryo transfers, laboratory procedures,
and ultrasounds. A health insurance plan may, but shall not be required to,
provide coverage for preimplantation genetic testing as a component of IVF.
(3) Fertility preservation services for all covered individuals.
(c) Access to services; limitations on coverage.
VT LEG #380804 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.302
2025 Page 5 of 7
(1) A health insurance plan shall not establish any rate, term, or
condition that places a greater financial burden on a covered individual for
access to fertility-related services than for access to treatment for any other
health condition.
(2) A health insurance plan shall not impose any limitations on coverage
for any fertility services based on a covered individual’s use of donor sperm or
eggs, donor embryos, or surrogacy.
(3) A health insurance plan is not required to provide coverage for:
(A) any experimental fertility procedure; or
(B) any nonmedical costs related to donor sperm or eggs, donor
embryos, or surrogacy.
Sec. 2. 33 V.S.A. § 1901n is added to read:
§ 1901n. COVERAGE OF FERTILITY-RELATED SERVICES
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Fertility diagnostic care,” “fertility preservation services,” and
“fertility treatment” have the same meanings as in 8 V.S.A. § 4099f.
(2) “Health care provider” has the same meaning as in 18 V.S.A.
§ 9402.
(b) The Agency of Human Services shall provide Medicaid coverage for
the following fertility-related services:
(1) Fertility diagnostic care for all Medicaid beneficiaries.
VT LEG #380804 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.302
2025 Page 6 of 7
(2) Fertility treatment for Medicaid beneficiaries with infertility,
including intrauterine insemination treatment with donor or partner semen, at
least four retrievals of oocytes under anesthesia for in vitro fertilization (IVF)
with donor or partner semen or egg, unlimited embryo transfers, laboratory
procedures, and ultrasounds. Vermont Medicaid may, but shall not be required
to, provide coverage for preimplantation genetic testing as a component of
IVF.
(3) Fertility preservation services for all Medicaid beneficiaries.
Sec. 3. COVERAGE FOR FERTILITY-RELATED SERVICES; MEDICAID
STATE PLAN AMENDMENT
On or before September 1, 2025, the Agency of Human Services shall
request approval from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to
amend Vermont’s Medicaid state plan to include coverage for fertility-related
services as set forth in Sec. 2 of this act.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) Sec. 1 (8 V.S.A. § 4099f) shall take effect on January 1, 2026 and shall
apply to all health insurance plans issued on and after January 1, 2026 on such
date as a health insurer offers, issues, or renews the health insurance plan, but
in no event later than January 1, 2027.
VT LEG #380804 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.302
2025 Page 7 of 7
(b) Sec. 2 (33 V.S.A. § 1901n) shall take effect upon approval by the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of Vermont’s request to provide
coverage of fertility-related services as set forth in that section.
(c) Sec. 3 (coverage for fertility-related services; Medicaid state plan
amendment) and this section shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380804 v.1